Illinois, session 104th, HB3221.
Be it enacted by the People of the State of Illinois, 3represented in the General Assembly: 4    Section 5. The Fish and Aquatic Life Code is amended by 5changing Section 20-45 as follows: 6    (515 ILCS 5/20-45)  (from Ch. 56, par. 20-45)7    Sec. 20-45. License fees for residents. Fees for licenses 8for residents of the State of Illinois shall be as follows:9        (a) Except as otherwise provided in this Section, for 10    sport fishing devices as defined in Section 10-95 or 11    spearing devices as defined in Section 10-110, the fee is 12    $14.50 for individuals 16 to 64 years old, one-half of the 13    current fishing license fee for individuals age 65 or 14    older, and, on or after the effective date of this 15    amendatory Act of the 104th General Assembly, the fee is 16    $5 commencing with the 2012 license year, one-half of the 17    current fishing license fee for resident veterans of the 18    United States Armed Forces after returning from service 19    abroad or mobilization by the President of the United 20    States as an active duty member of the United States Armed 21    Forces, the Illinois National Guard, or the Reserves of 22    the United States Armed Forces. Veterans must provide to 23    the Department acceptable verification of their service.   HB3221- 2 -LRB104 08617 BDA 18669 b1    The Department shall establish by administrative rule the 2    procedure by which such verification of service shall be 3    made to the Department for the purpose of issuing fishing 4    licenses to resident veterans at a reduced fee.5        (a-3) Except as otherwise provided in this Section, 6    for sport fishing devices as defined in Section 10-95 or 7    spearing devices as defined in Section 10-110, residents 8    of this State may obtain a 3-year fishing license. The fee 9    for a 3-year fishing license is 3 times the annual fee. For 10    residents age 65 or older, the fee is one half of the fee 11    charged for a 3-year fishing license. For resident 12    veterans of the United States Armed Forces after returning 13    from service abroad or mobilization by the President of 14    the United States, the fee is $5 one-half of the fee 15    charged for a 3-year fishing license. Veterans must 16    provide to the Department, per administrative rule, 17    verification of their service. The Department shall 18    establish what constitutes suitable verification of 19    service for the purpose of issuing 3-year fishing licenses 20    to resident veterans at a reduced fee. 21        (a-5) The fee for all sport fishing licenses shall be 22    $1 for an annual license and 3 times the annual fee for a 23    3-year license for residents over 75 years of age. 24        (b) All residents before using any commercial fishing 25    device shall obtain a commercial fishing license, the fee 26    for which shall be $60 and a resident fishing license, the   HB3221- 3 -LRB104 08617 BDA 18669 b1    fee for which is $14.50. Each and every commercial device 2    used shall be licensed by a resident commercial fisherman 3    as follows:4            (1) For each 100 lineal yards, or fraction 5        thereof, of seine the fee is $18. For each minnow 6        seine, minnow trap, or net for commercial purposes the 7        fee is $20.8            (2) For each device to fish with a 100 hook trot 9        line device, basket trap, hoop net, or dip net the fee 10        is $3.11            (3) When used in the waters of Lake Michigan, for 12        the first 2000 lineal feet, or fraction thereof, of 13        gill net the fee is $10; and for each 1000 additional 14        lineal feet, or fraction thereof, the fee is $10. 15        These fees shall apply to all gill nets in use in the 16        water or on drying reels on the shore.17            (4) For each 100 lineal yards, or fraction 18        thereof, of gill net or trammel net the fee is $18.19        (c) Residents of this State may obtain a sportsmen's 20    combination license that shall entitle the holder to the 21    same non-commercial fishing privileges as residents 22    holding a license as described in subsection (a) of this 23    Section and to the same hunting privileges as residents 24    holding a license to hunt all species as described in 25    Section 3.1 of the Wildlife Code. No sportsmen's 26    combination license shall be issued to any individual who   HB3221- 4 -LRB104 08617 BDA 18669 b1    would be ineligible for either the fishing or hunting 2    license separately. The sportsmen's combination license 3    fee shall be $25.50. For residents age 65 or older, the fee 4    is one-half of the fee charged for a sportsmen's 5    combination license. For resident veterans of the United 6    States Armed Forces after returning from service abroad or 7    mobilization by the President of the United States as an 8    active duty member of the United States Armed Forces, the 9    Illinois National Guard, or the Reserves of the United 10    States Armed Forces, the fee, commencing with the 2012 11    license year, is one-half of the fee charged for a 12    sportsmen's combination license. Veterans must provide to 13    the Department acceptable verification of their service. 14    The Department shall establish by administrative rule the 15    procedure by which such verification of service shall be 16    made to the Department for the purpose of issuing 17    sportsmen's combination licenses to resident veterans at a 18    reduced fee.19        (c-5) Residents of this State may obtain a 3-year 20    sportsmen's combination license that shall entitle the 21    holder to the same non-commercial fishing privileges as 22    residents holding a license as described in subsection 23    (a-3) and to the same hunting privileges as residents 24    holding a license to hunt all species as described in 25    Section 3.1 of the Wildlife Code. A 3-year sportsmen's 26    combination license shall not be issued to any individual   HB3221- 5 -LRB104 08617 BDA 18669 b1    who would be ineligible for either the fishing or hunting 2    license separately. The 3-year sportsmen's combination 3    license fee shall be 3 times the annual fee. For residents 4    age 65 or older, the fee is one-half of the fee charged for 5    a 3-year sportsmen's combination license. For resident 6    veterans of the United States Armed Forces after returning 7    from service abroad or mobilization by the President of 8    the United States, the fee is one-half of the fee charged 9    for a 3-year sportsmen's combination license. Veterans 10    must provide to the Department, per administrative rule, 11    verification of their service. The Department shall 12    establish what constitutes suitable verification of 13    service for the purpose of issuing 3-year sportsmen's 14    combination licenses to resident veterans at a reduced 15    fee. 16        (d) For 24 hours of fishing by sport fishing devices 17    as defined in Section 10-95 or by spearing devices as 18    defined in Section 10-110 the fee is $5. This license does 19    not exempt the licensee from the requirement for a salmon 20    or inland trout stamp. The licenses provided for by this 21    subsection are not required for residents of the State of 22    Illinois who have obtained the license provided for in 23    subsection (a) or (a-3) of this Section.24        (e) All residents before using any commercial mussel 25    device shall obtain a commercial mussel license, the fee 26    for which shall be $50.  HB3221- 6 -LRB104 08617 BDA 18669 b1        (f) Residents of this State, upon establishing 2    residency as required by the Department, may obtain a 3    lifetime hunting or fishing license or lifetime 4    sportsmen's combination license which shall entitle the 5    holder to the same non-commercial fishing privileges as 6    residents holding a license as described in paragraph (a) 7    of this Section and to the same hunting privileges as 8    residents holding a license to hunt all species as 9    described in Section 3.1 of the Wildlife Code. No lifetime 10    sportsmen's combination license shall be issued to or 11    retained by any individual who would be ineligible for 12    either the fishing or hunting license separately, either 13    upon issuance, or in any year a violation would subject an 14    individual to have either or both fishing or hunting 15    privileges rescinded. The lifetime hunting and fishing 16    license fees shall be as follows:17            (1) Lifetime fishing: 30 x the current fishing 18        license fee.19            (2) Lifetime hunting: 30 x the current hunting 20        license fee.21            (3) Lifetime sportsmen's combination license: 30 x 22        the current sportsmen's combination license fee.23    Lifetime licenses shall not be refundable. A $10 fee shall 24be charged for reissuing any lifetime license. The Department 25may establish rules and regulations for the issuance and use 26of lifetime licenses and may suspend or revoke any lifetime   HB3221- 7 -LRB104 08617 BDA 18669 b1license issued under this Section for violations of those 2rules or regulations or other provisions under this Code or 3the Wildlife Code, or a violation of the United States Code 4that involves the taking, possessing, killing, harvesting, 5transportation, selling, exporting, or importing any fish or 6aquatic life protected by this Code or the taking, possessing, 7killing, harvesting, transportation, selling, exporting, or 8importing any fauna protected by the Wildlife Code when any 9part of the United States Code violation occurred in Illinois. 10Individuals under 16 years of age who possess a lifetime 11hunting or sportsmen's combination license shall have in their 12possession, while in the field, a certificate of competency as 13required under Section 3.2 of the Wildlife Code. Any lifetime 14license issued under this Section shall not exempt individuals 15from obtaining additional stamps or permits required under the 16provisions of this Code or the Wildlife Code. Individuals 17required to purchase additional stamps shall sign the stamps 18and have them in their possession while fishing or hunting 19with a lifetime license. All fees received from the issuance 20of lifetime licenses shall be deposited in the Fish and 21Wildlife Endowment Fund.22    Except for licenses issued under subsection (e) of this 23Section, all licenses provided for in this Section shall 24expire on March 31 of each year, except that the license 25provided for in subsection (d) of this Section shall expire 24 26hours after the effective date and time listed on the face of   HB3221- 8 -LRB104 08617 BDA 18669 b1the license. Licenses issued under subsection (a-3) or (c-5) 2shall expire on March 31 of the 2nd year after the year in 3which the license is issued. 4    The Department shall by administrative rule provide for 5the automatic renewal of a fishing license upon the request of 6the applicant. 7    All individuals required to have and failing to have the 8license provided for in subsection (a), (a-3), or (d) of this 9Section shall be fined according to the provisions of Section 1020-35 of this Code.11    All individuals required to have and failing to have the 12licenses provided for in subsections (b) and (e) of this 13Section shall be guilty of a Class B misdemeanor.14    (g) For the purposes of this Section, "acceptable 15verification" means official documentation from the Department 16of Defense or the appropriate Major Command showing 17mobilization dates or service abroad dates, including: (i) a 18DD-214, (ii) a letter from the Illinois Department of Military 19Affairs for members of the Illinois National Guard, (iii) a 20letter from the Regional Reserve Command for members of the 21Armed Forces Reserve, (iv) a letter from the Major Command 22covering Illinois for active duty members, (v) personnel 23records for mobilized State employees, and (vi) any other 24documentation that the Department, by administrative rule, 25deems acceptable to establish dates of mobilization or service 26abroad.   HB3221- 9 -LRB104 08617 BDA 18669 b1    For the purposes of this Section, the term "service 2abroad" means active duty service outside of the 50 United 3States and the District of Columbia, and includes all active 4duty service in territories and possessions of the United 5States. 6(Source: P.A. 102-780, eff. 5-13-22; 102-837, eff. 5-13-22; 7103-154, eff. 6-30-23; 103-456, eff. 1-1-24.) 8    Section 10. The Wildlife Code is amended by changing 9Section 3.2 as follows: 10    (520 ILCS 5/3.2)  (from Ch. 61, par. 3.2)11    Sec. 3.2. Hunting license; application; instruction. 12Before the Department or any county, city, village, township, 13incorporated town clerk or his duly designated agent or any 14other person authorized or designated by the Department to 15issue hunting licenses shall issue a hunting license to any 16person, the person shall file his application with the 17Department or other party authorized to issue licenses on a 18form provided by the Department and further give definite 19proof of identity and place of legal residence. Each clerk 20designating agents to issue licenses and stamps shall furnish 21the Department, within 10 days following the appointment, the 22names and mailing addresses of the agents. Each clerk or his 23duly designated agent shall be authorized to sell licenses and 24stamps only within the territorial area for which he was   HB3221- 10 -LRB104 08617 BDA 18669 b1elected or appointed. No duly designated agent is authorized 2to furnish licenses or stamps for issuance by any other 3business establishment. Each application shall be executed and 4sworn to and shall set forth the name and description of the 5applicant and place of residence.6    No hunting license shall be issued to any person born on or 7after January 1, 1980 unless he presents the person authorized 8to issue the license evidence that he has held a hunting 9license issued by the State of Illinois or another state in a 10prior year, or a certificate of competency as provided in this 11Section. Persons under 18 years of age may be issued a Lifetime 12Hunting or Sportsmen's Combination License as provided under 13Section 20-45 of the Fish and Aquatic Life Code but shall not 14be entitled to hunt alone, without the supervision of an adult 15age 21 or older, unless they have a certificate of competency 16as provided in this Section and the certificate is in their 17possession while hunting.18    The Department of Natural Resources shall authorize 19personnel of the Department or certified volunteer instructors 20to conduct courses, of not less than 10 hours in length, in 21firearms and hunter safety, which may include training in bow 22and arrow safety, at regularly specified intervals throughout 23the State. Persons successfully completing the course shall 24receive a certificate of competency. The Department of Natural 25Resources may further cooperate with any reputable association 26or organization in establishing courses if the organization   HB3221- 11 -LRB104 08617 BDA 18669 b1has as one of its objectives the promotion of safety in the 2handling of firearms or bow and arrow.3    The Department of Natural Resources shall designate any 4person found by it to be competent to give instruction in the 5handling of firearms, hunter safety, and bow and arrow. The 6persons so appointed shall give the course of instruction and 7upon the successful completion shall issue to the person 8instructed a certificate of competency in the safe handling of 9firearms, hunter safety, and bow and arrow. No charge shall be 10made for any course of instruction except for materials or 11ammunition consumed. The Department of Natural Resources shall 12furnish information on the requirements of hunter safety 13education programs to be distributed free of charge to 14applicants for hunting licenses by the persons appointed and 15authorized to issue licenses. Funds for the conducting of 16firearms and hunter safety courses shall be taken from the fee 17charged for the Firearm Owners Identification Card.18    The fee for a hunting license to hunt all species for a 19resident of Illinois is $12. For residents age 65 or older, 20and, commencing with the 2012 license year, resident veterans 21of the United States Armed Forces after returning from service 22abroad or mobilization by the President of the United States 23as an active duty member of the United States Armed Forces, the 24Illinois National Guard, or the Reserves of the United States 25Armed Forces, the fee is one-half of the fee charged for a 26hunting license to hunt all species for a resident of   HB3221- 12 -LRB104 08617 BDA 18669 b1Illinois. On or after the effective date of this amendatory 2Act of the 104th General Assembly, the fee for a hunting 3license to hunt all species is $5 for resident veterans of the 4United States Armed Forces after returning from service abroad 5or mobilization by the President of the United States as an 6active duty member of the United States Armed Forces, the 7Illinois National Guard, or the Reserves of the United States 8Armed Forces. Veterans must provide to the Department 9acceptable verification of their service. The Department shall 10establish by administrative rule the procedure by which such 11verification of service shall be made to the Department for 12the purpose of issuing resident veterans hunting licenses at a 13reduced fee. The fee for a hunting license to hunt all species 14shall be $1 for residents over 75 years of age. Nonresidents 15shall be charged $57 for a hunting license.16    Residents of this State may obtain a 3-year hunting 17license to hunt all species as described in Section 3.1 for 3 18times the annual fee. For residents age 65 or older and 19resident veterans of the United States Armed Forces after 20returning from service abroad or mobilization by the President 21of the United States, the fee is one-half of the fee charged 22for a 3-year hunting license to hunt all species as described 23in Section 3.1 for a resident of this State. Veterans must 24provide to the Department, per administrative rule, 25verification of their service. For resident veterans of the 26United States Armed Forces after returning from service abroad   HB3221- 13 -LRB104 08617 BDA 18669 b1or mobilization by the President of the United States, the fee 2is $5. The Department shall establish what constitutes 3suitable verification of service for the purpose of issuing 4resident veterans 3-year hunting licenses at a reduced fee. 5    Nonresidents may be issued a nonresident hunting license 6for a period not to exceed 10 consecutive days' hunting in the 7State and shall be charged a fee of $35.8    A special nonresident hunting license authorizing a 9nonresident to take game birds by hunting on a game breeding 10and hunting preserve area only, established under Section 113.27, shall be issued upon proper application being made and 12payment of a fee equal to that for a resident hunting license. 13The expiration date of this license shall be on the same date 14each year that game breeding and hunting preserve area 15licenses expire.16    Each applicant for a State Migratory Waterfowl Stamp, 17regardless of his residence or other condition, shall pay a 18fee of $15 and shall receive a stamp. The fee for a State 19Migratory Waterfowl Stamp shall be waived for residents over 2075 years of age. Except as provided under Section 20-45 of the 21Fish and Aquatic Life Code, the stamp shall be signed by the 22person or affixed to his license or permit in a space 23designated by the Department for that purpose.24    Each applicant for a State Habitat Stamp, regardless of 25his residence or other condition, shall pay a fee of $5 and 26shall receive a stamp. The fee for a State Habitat Stamp shall   HB3221- 14 -LRB104 08617 BDA 18669 b1be waived for residents over 75 years of age. Except as 2provided under Section 20-45 of the Fish and Aquatic Life 3Code, the stamp shall be signed by the person or affixed to his 4license or permit in a space designated by the Department for 5that purpose.6    Nothing in this Section shall be construed as to require 7the purchase of more than one State Habitat Stamp by any person 8in any one license year.9    The fees for State Pheasant Stamps and State Furbearer 10Stamps shall be waived for residents over 75 years of age. 11    The Department shall furnish the holders of hunting 12licenses and stamps with an insignia as evidence of possession 13of license, or license and stamp, as the Department may 14consider advisable. The insignia shall be exhibited and used 15as the Department may order.16    All other hunting licenses and all State stamps shall 17expire upon March 31 of each year. Three-year hunting licenses 18shall expire on March 31 of the 2nd year after the year in 19which the license is issued.20    Every person holding any license, permit, or stamp issued 21under the provisions of this Act shall have it in his 22possession for immediate presentation for inspection to the 23officers and authorized employees of the Department, any 24sheriff, deputy sheriff, or any other peace officer making a 25demand for it. This provision shall not apply to Department 26owned or managed sites where it is required that all hunters   HB3221- 15 -LRB104 08617 BDA 18669 b1deposit their license, permit, or Firearm Owner's 2Identification Card at the check station upon entering the 3hunting areas.4    For the purposes of this Section, "acceptable 5verification" means official documentation from the Department 6of Defense or the appropriate Major Command showing 7mobilization dates or service abroad dates, including: (i) a 8DD-214, (ii) a letter from the Illinois Department of Military 9Affairs for members of the Illinois National Guard, (iii) a 10letter from the Regional Reserve Command for members of the 11Armed Forces Reserve, (iv) a letter from the Major Command 12covering Illinois for active duty members, (v) personnel 13records for mobilized State employees, and (vi) any other 14documentation that the Department, by administrative rule, 15deems acceptable to establish dates of mobilization or service 16abroad. 17    For the purposes of this Section, the term "service 18abroad" means active duty service outside of the 50 United 19States and the District of Columbia, and includes all active 20duty service in territories and possessions of the United 21States. 22(Source: P.A. 102-780, eff. 5-13-22; 103-456, eff. 1-1-24.)